Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-122
Protection order enforcement; confidential information.

When provided by the petitioner, the court shall make confidential numeric victim identification information, including social security numbers and dates of birth, available to appropriate criminal justice agencies engaged in protection order enforcement efforts. Such agencies shall maintain the confidentiality of this information, except for entry into state and federal databases for protection order enforcement.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 22.